Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH

SUBTITLE A. HOSPITAL DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 1119. SCURRY COUNTY HOSPITAL DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1119.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "District" means the Scurry County Hospital District.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 811), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 1119.051. EMPLOYMENT OF HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS. (a) The board may employ health care providers other than physicians as the board considers necessary for the efficient operation of the district.

(b) The board may delegate to the administrator of the district the authority to employ health care providers under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 811), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER C. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1119.101. GENERAL AUTHORITY TO BORROW MONEY; SECURITY. (a) The board may borrow money at a rate not to exceed the maximum annual percentage rate allowed by law for district obligations at the time the loan is made.

(b) To secure a loan, the board may pledge:

(1) district revenue that is not pledged to pay the district's bonded indebtedness;

(2) a district tax to be imposed by the district during the 12-month period following the date of the pledge that is not pledged to pay the principal of or interest on district bonds; or

(3) district bonds that have been authorized but not sold.

(c) A loan for which taxes or bonds are pledged must mature not later than the first anniversary of the date the loan is made. A loan for which district revenue is pledged must mature not later than the fifth anniversary of the date the loan is made.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 811), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER D. BONDS

Sec. 1119.151. ADDITIONAL MEANS OF SECURING REPAYMENT OF BONDS. In addition to the authority to issue general obligation bonds and revenue bonds under Subchapter G, Chapter 286, Health and Safety Code, the board may provide for the security and repayment of district bonds from a pledge of a combination of taxes as authorized by Section 286.142, Health and Safety Code, and revenue and other sources as authorized by Section 286.144, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 811), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 1119.152. USE OF BOND PROCEEDS. The district may use the proceeds of bonds issued under Chapter 286, Health and Safety Code, to pay:

(1) any expense the board determines is reasonable and necessary to issue, sell, and deliver the bonds;

(2) interest payments on the bonds during a period of acquisition or construction of a project or facility to be provided through the bonds, not to exceed five years;

(3) costs related to the operation and maintenance of a project or facility to be provided through the bonds:

(A) during an estimated period of acquisition or construction, not to exceed five years; and

(B) for one year after the project or facility is acquired or constructed;

(4) costs related to the financing of the bond funds, including debt service reserve and contingency funds;

(5) costs related to the bond issuance;

(6) costs related to the acquisition of land or interests in land for a project or facility to be provided through the bonds; and

(7) costs of construction of a project or facility to be provided through the bonds, including the payment of related professional services and expenses.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 946 (H.B. 811), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.